Missouri, session 2026, SB1361.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 314, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 314.400, to read as
follows:
314.400. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Second Amendment Financial Privacy Act".
2. As used in this section, unless the context
otherwise clearly indicates another meaning, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Customer", a resident of this state engaged in a
payment card transaction that a financial institution
facilitates or processes;
(2) "Disclosure" or "disclose", the transfer,
publication, or distribution of protected financial
information to another person or entity for any purpose
other than:
(a) To process or facilitate a payment card
transaction; or
(b) To take any actions related to dispute processing,
fraud management, or protecting transaction integrity from

SB 1361 2
concerns related to illegal activities, a data breach, or
cyber risks;
(3) "Financial institution", an entity involved in
facilitating or processing a payment card transaction,
including, but not limited to, a bank, an acquirer, a
payment card network, or a payment card issuer;
(4) "Financial record", a record held by a financial
institution related to a payment card transaction that the
financial institution has processed or facilitated;
(5) "Firearms merchant category code", the merchant
category code 5723 approved in September of 2022 by the
International Organization for Standardization for firearms
retailers or any other indicator that a financial
institution assigns to a merchant that identifies a merchant
as a firearms retailer or the payment card transaction as
involving the purchase of a firearm, firearm ammunition,
ammunition components for use with firearms, or firearm
accessories;
(6) "Firearms retailer", a person or entity physically
located in this state and engaged in the lawful business of
selling or trading firearms, ammunition, ammunition
components for use with firearms, or firearm accessories;
(7) "Protected financial information", any record of a
sale, purchase, return, or refund involving a payment card
that is retrieved, characterized, generated, labeled,
sorted, or grouped based on the assignment of a firearms
merchant category code.
3. (1) A financial institution, or its agents, shall
not require the usage of a firearms merchant category code
by a firearms retailer physically located in this state in a
manner that distinguishes a firearms retailer from a general
merchandise retailer or a sporting goods retailer.

SB 1361 3
(2) A financial institution shall not discriminate
against a firearms retailer by declining a lawful payment
card transaction based solely on the assignment or
nonassignment of a firearms merchant category code;
provided, that a financial institution may decline or
otherwise refuse to process the transaction on the basis of
the firearms merchant category code only:
(a) If necessary to comply with this section;
(b) If requested by the customer; or
(c) Due to fraud controls or merchant category
exclusions offered by a financial entity for the purpose of
expenditure control or corporate card control.
(3) Except as otherwise required by law or regulation,
a financial institution shall not disclose a financial
record, including protected financial information, that was
collected in violation of this section unless the disclosure
of the financial record or protected financial information
was based on a good-faith conclusion that the entity's
action was required by applicable law or regulation.
(4) This section shall not limit the ability of a
financial institution to negotiate with responsible parties
or otherwise impair the financial institution's actions
related to dispute processing, fraud management, or
protecting transaction integrity from concerns related to
illegal activities, a data breach, or cyber risks.
4. (1) The attorney general shall investigate alleged
violations of this section and, upon finding a violation,
shall provide written notice to any individual or entity
believed to be in violation. Written notice to a commercial
entity shall be made to the entity's registered agent. Upon
receipt of the written notice from the attorney general, the

SB 1361 4
entity shall cease any violation of this section within
thirty calendar days.
(2) A firearms retailer physically located in this
state whose business was the subject of an alleged violation
of this section or a customer who transacted at a firearms
retailer physically located in this state whose business was
the subject of an alleged violation of this section, may
petition the attorney general to investigate an alleged
violation of this section.
(3) (a) If an individual or entity is found to be in
violation of this section and fails to cease the violating
activity after the expiration of thirty calendar days from
the receipt of written notice by the attorney general's
office, then the attorney general shall pursue an injunction
against the individual or entity alleged to be in violation
of this section. The attorney general may pursue an
injunction pursuant to this section in the circuit court
where the alleged violation occurred.
(b) If a court finds that an individual or entity
continues to be in violation of this section after thirty
100 calendar days from receiving written notice from the
101 attorney general in accordance with subdivision (1) of this
102 subsection, then the court shall enjoin the individual or
103 entity from continuing the activity found to be in violation
104 of this section.
105 (c) If an individual or entity knowingly and willfully
106 fails to comply with an injunction issued pursuant to
107 paragraph (b) of this subdivision within thirty days after
108 being served with the injunction, then the attorney general,
109 upon petition to the court, may recover on behalf of the
110 state a civil penalty in a sum not to exceed ten thousand
111 dollars for each violation committed after the expiration of

SB 1361 5
112 the thirty-day period provided in subdivision (1) of this
113 subsection. In assessing a penalty, the court shall
114 consider the financial resources of the violator and the
115 harm or risk of harm to the rights afforded to the
116 individual pursuant to the Second Amendment of the United
117 States Constitution resulting from the violation. The
118 attorney general may also recover, in addition to the civil
119 penalty pursuant to this subsection, investigative costs and
120 reasonable attorney's fees. An order assessing a penalty
121 for violation of this section shall be stayed pending appeal
122 of the order.
123 (4) It is an affirmative defense to a proceeding
124 initiated pursuant to this section that the firearms
125 merchant category code was required to be used based on a
126 good-faith conclusion that the entity's disclosure or action
127 was required by applicable law or regulation.
✓